Utah statutes.
16-10a-1021.   Bylaw changing quorum or voting requirement for shareholders.
(1)  If authorized by the articles of incorporation or this chapter, the
shareholders may adopt, amend, or repeal a bylaw that fixes a greater quorum
or voting requirement for shareholders, or voting groups of shareholders, than
is required by this chapter.  Such action is subject to the provisions of Part
7, Shareholders.
(2)  A bylaw that fixes a greater quorum or voting requirement for
shareholders under Subsection (1) may not be adopted, amended, or repealed by
the board of directors.
